Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 41 Local Correctional Facilities
12-41-615. Bonds — Investment by public entities.

Any municipality, or any board, commission, or other governing authority established by ordinance of any municipality, or the governing authorities, respectively, of the local firefighters pension and relief fund and police officer's pension and relief fund of any such municipality or the governing authority of any retirement system created by the General Assembly or any agency in its discretion may invest any of its funds not immediately needed for its purposes in bonds issued under the provisions of this subchapter.

Any bonds issued under the provisions of this subchapter shall be eligible to secure the deposit of public funds.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 879, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-439.

12-41-616. Creation of rights.

This subchapter shall not create any right of any character, and no right of any character shall arise under the provisions of this subchapter, unless and until the bonds authorized by this subchapter, or the initial series, shall have been sold and delivered by the county jail board.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 879, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-442.

12-41-617. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the county jail revenue bond fund, was repealed by Acts 1995, No. 1256, § 20, as amended by Acts 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 13, § 4. The section was derived from Acts 1981, No. 879, § 5; 1983, No. 226, § 1; 1985, No. 874, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-433; Acts 1989, No. 96, § 1; 1991, No. 904, §§ 3, 20.

Subchapter 7

— Jail Boards — Revenue Bonds

Effective Dates. Acts 1983, No. 918, § 16: Mar. 30, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Fourth General Assembly that the act of driving a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating alcoholic beverages or drugs constitutes a serious and immediate threat to the safety of all citizens of this state, and that increasing the penalty for this dangerous conduct may serve as a deterrent to such behavior. Further, it is found that increased income derived from the levying of such penalties can best be utilized to provide immediate alcohol and drug safety and rehabilitation and treatment programs both to prevent an increase in the use of intoxicating alcoholic beverages and drugs and to rehabilitate persons convicted of related offenses. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 2003, No. 1772, § 5: Apr. 22, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the counties, municipalities, public instrumentalities and other governmental entities of the State of Arkansas are experiencing severe jail overcrowding, and that existing jail facilities may not be in compliance with applicable state and federal regulations. It is further recognized that funding for jail renovation, improvement, and construction is extremely limited and oftentimes can be funded only through the implementation of new sales taxes, and that the failure to immediately address this problem could result in the possible closure of existing jail facilities, and the release of incarcerants prior to the schedule expiration of their terms. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

12-41-701. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Board” means the county jail board, municipal jail board, or public instrumentality jail board, as the case may be, established by ordinance or resolution of the quorum court of the county or the governing body of the municipality or public instrumentality under the provisions of this subchapter;

“Bonds” means bonds, series of bonds, or other evidences of indebtedness authorized by and issued by a board pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter;

“Construct” or “construction” means to acquire, construct, reconstruct, remodel, install, and equip any lands, buildings, structures, improvements, or other real, personal, or mixed property used in connection with a jail and to make other necessary expenditures in connection therewith, by such methods and in such manner as may be authorized by law.

“Construct” or “construction” also includes payment or provision for payment of expenses incidental thereto;

“Expand” or “expansion” means to add, renovate, extend, or improve a jail and may include any necessary or appropriate remodeling or improvement to a present jail and shall include appropriate equipment and furnishings as determined by the board.

“Expand” or “expansion” also includes payment or provision for payment of expenses incidental to expansion;

“Fines” or “fines and penalties” means the fines, penalties, bonds against fines, court costs, filing fees, other court fees, and other sums payable by judicial order, statute, ordinance, or otherwise imposed by law and collected by a county, municipality, or public instrumentality or otherwise;

“Jail” means a county jail or jails and jail facilities of a county, a municipal jail or jails and jail facilities of a municipality, or a public instrumentality jail or jails and jail facilities of a public instrumentality in this state.

“Jail” also means a jail constructed and operated under a cooperative agreement between any two (2) or more municipalities, counties, or public instrumentalities in any combination for the housing of their respective misdemeanant incarcerants and other incarcerants awaiting trial;

“Jail facilities” means all property of any nature, whether personal or real, tangible or intangible, related in any way to a jail and its functions;

“Municipality” means any city of the first class or city of the second class and any incorporated town in this state;

“Pledged revenues” means all revenues allocated by this subchapter to be pledged for the security and payment of the bonds; and

“Public instrumentality” means any public facilities board, regardless of whether formed by county or municipal ordinance, and any other governmental or political subdivision of this state.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2001 Arkansas General Assembly, Criminal Law, 24 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 429.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 918, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-451; Acts 2001, No. 561, § 32; 2003, No. 1772, § 1.

12-41-702. Method supplemental.

The method set forth in this subchapter for construction, renovation, or expansion of jails shall be supplemental to any other method authorized by law for construction, renovation, or expansion of jails.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 918, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-452; Acts 2003, No. 1772, § 1.

12-41-703. Adoption of ordinance.

Any county quorum court or governing body of a municipality or public instrumentality desiring to construct, renovate, or expand a jail in the manner authorized in this subchapter may adopt an ordinance or resolution to establish a county jail board, municipal jail board, or public instrumentality jail board and to authorize the board to issue revenue bonds to construct, renovate, or expand the jail in the manner authorized in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 918, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-454; Acts 2003, No. 1772, § 1.

12-41-704. Jail boards.

Any county, municipality, or public instrumentality electing to form a county jail board, municipal jail board, or public instrumentality jail board for the purpose of issuing bonds under the provisions of this subchapter, shall, by ordinance or resolution adopted by the county quorum court or by the governing body of the municipality or public instrumentality, establish a board consisting of such members, not fewer than three (3) nor more than seven (7) in number, as provided in the ordinance or resolution.

Any member of the board may be removed for misfeasance, malfeasance, or willful neglect of duty by the county quorum court, governing body of the municipality, or public instrumentality that created the board after reasonable notice and an opportunity for a hearing concerning the alleged grounds for removal.

The county judge of the county shall serve as a member of a board created by the county, and the principal executive officer of the municipality or public instrumentality shall serve as a member of a board created by a municipality or public instrumentality unless the county judge or principal executive officer is removed as provided in this subchapter.

The board is authorized and empowered to:

Construct a jail or provide for the renovation or expansion of an existing jail on a site or sites selected by the board;

Enter into contracts with the United States Government, any state agency, state or governmental body or political subdivision, public or private corporation or other legal entity or any individual or a combination of any of these entities and individuals to provide for the design, financing, construction, expansion, operation, and maintenance of all or any portion of a jail or for any combination of the services and functions;

Arrange for the housing of incarcerants during the period in which any such jail is undergoing construction, renovation, or expansion;

Construct or cause to be constructed parking facilities to serve the jail and the public having business therein;

Obtain the necessary funds for accomplishing its powers, purposes, and authority;

Purchase, lease, or rent and receive bequests or donations of or otherwise acquire, sell, trade, or barter any real, personal, or mixed property and convert into money or any property not needed or which cannot be used in its then current form;

Contract and be contracted with, apply for, receive, accept, and use any moneys and property from the United States Government, any state agency, any state or governmental body or political subdivision, any public or private corporation of any nature, or any individual;

Enter into long-term or short-term contracts with counties, municipalities, public instrumentalities, the State of Arkansas, agencies of the federal government, and other public entities under which the board shall provide nightly or other periodic housing of these entities' misdemeanant or other incarcerants for fee compensation or other consideration;

Offer incarcerants the option in lieu of incarceration to participate in community service programs and all other forms of voluntary labor;

To the extent allowed under applicable law, enter into contracts with third party governmental entities under which the board may receive compensation for supplying to those entities with the voluntary services and labor of incarcerants;

Enter into jail management contracts with third party governmental or private organizations upon terms and conditions that the board determines appropriate;

Pledge to the repayment of debt any and all contract receivables and revenues of any kind that are payable to the board;

Mortgage real property and grant a security interest in all personal, intangible, or other property, including all contract receivables and revenues of any kind that are payable to the board;

Borrow funds that shall be available for board use with an obligation to repay;

Invest and reinvest any of its moneys and securities as authorized by law; and

Take such other action not inconsistent with law as may be necessary and desirable to carry out the power, purposes, and authority set forth in this subchapter and to carry out the intent of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 918, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-453; Acts 2003, No. 1772, § 1.

12-41-705. Bonds — Authority to issue.

The county jail board, municipal jail board, or public instrumentality jail board is authorized and empowered to issue bonds at one (1) time or in series from time to time and to use the proceeds thereof, together with any other funds, for financing the cost of construction, renovation, expansion of the jail together with all expenses incidental to and reasonably necessary in connection therewith, the expenses of the issuance of the bonds, the creating and maintenance of reserves to secure the payment of the bonds if the board deems it necessary or desirable, and for providing for the payment of the interest on the bonds if necessary or desirable until sufficient funds are available therefor out of pledged revenues.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 918, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-456; Acts 2003, No. 1772, § 1.

12-41-706. Bonds — Authorizing resolution.

The bonds shall be authorized by resolution of the county jail board, municipal jail board, or public instrumentality jail board.

The authorizing resolution, as the board shall determine, may contain any terms, covenants, and conditions that are deemed necessary or desirable by the board including, without limitation, those pertaining to the:

Creation and maintenance of various funds and reserves;

Nature and extent of the security;

Issuance of additional series of bonds and the priority of lien and pledge in that event; and

Rights, duties, and obligations of the board and of the holders and registered owners of the bonds.

The authorizing resolution may provide for the execution of a trust indenture with a bank or trust company located within or outside the State of Arkansas containing appropriate terms, covenants, and conditions.

Shall be registrable as to both principal and interest;

May contain exchange provisions;

May be in a form and denomination as the board determines;

May be payable on a date or dates as the board determines;

May be stated to mature at a time or times as the board determines;

May bear interest payable at such times and at such rate or rates as the board determines;

May be made payable at places within and without the State of Arkansas;

May be made subject to terms of redemption in advance of maturity at times and at prices as the board determines; and

May contain other terms and conditions as the board determines.

The fee revenues and the gross revenues derived from revenues collected from fines or penalties for convictions of the offenses as defined in this subchapter;

All real property and personal property owned by the county jail board, municipal jail board, or public instrumentality jail board; and

All other collateral identified in the trust indenture pursuant to which the bonds are issued.

The pledged revenues and the principal and interest are specifically declared to be cash funds, restricted in their use and dedication, and to be used solely as provided in this subchapter.

Bonds may additionally be secured and collateralized by:

The board's pledge of contract revenue receivables realized through the execution of contracts with third parties for incarcerant housing;

Income received from supplying third parties with incarcerant services and labor; and

All other revenues and income that the board may realize through its operations that are otherwise expressly pledged and identified in the bonds' trust indenture or authorizing resolution.

There is created a fund designated the jail revenue bond fund, with respect to bonds issued under this subchapter to be maintained at such depository as shall be specified by the board.

The jail revenue fund shall be a trust fund and, after the issuance of any bonds pursuant to this subchapter, the moneys therein shall be applied for the payment of the principal of, premiums, if any, and interest on the bonds, trustees' fees, paying agents' fees, and any other fees in connection with the bonds at maturity and at redemption prior to maturity, except moneys that are withdrawn therefrom pursuant to § 12-41-709(b), all as shall be specified and subject to the terms and conditions set forth in the authorizing resolution or trust indenture.

The pledged revenues shall not be deposited into the county treasury, municipal treasury, or public instrumentality treasury but, when received, shall be deposited into the appropriate jail revenue bond fund.

The principal, premiums, if any, and interest on the bonds and trustees' fees, paying agents' fees, and any other fees in connection with the bonds may be paid from the moneys in the jail revenue bond fund and the moneys required by this subchapter to be deposited into the jail revenue bond fund.

The board is directed to insert appropriate provisions in the authorizing resolution or trust indenture for the investment and reinvestment of moneys in the jail revenue bond fund in securities selected by the board, and all income derived from the investment shall be and become part of the jail revenue bond fund.

Any municipality, county, public instrumentality, or other governmental entity may pledge all or any portion of its fines, penalties, bonds against fines, court costs, filing fees, other court fees, and other sums payable by judicial order, statute, ordinance, or otherwise imposed by law and collected by the entity towards the repayment of any debt issued by a board or any public facilities board operating, owning, or administering a jail facility.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 918, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-456; Acts 2003, No. 1772, § 1.

12-41-707. Bonds — Contract between parties — Enforcement.

Together with this subchapter and the ordinance or resolution of the quorum court or the governing body of the municipality or public instrumentality acting pursuant to this subchapter, each authorizing resolution or trust indenture shall constitute a contract by and between the county jail board, municipal jail board, or public instrumentality jail board and the holders and registered owners of the bonds issued pursuant to this subchapter.

The contract and all covenants, agreements, and obligations therein shall be properly performed in strict accordance with the terms and provisions thereof.

The covenants, agreements, and obligations of the bonds may be enforced by mandamus or other appropriate proceedings at law or in equity.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 918, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-459; Acts 2003, No. 1772, § 1.

12-41-708. Bonds — Terms and conditions.

As the county jail board, municipal jail board, or public instrumentality jail board shall determine, the bonds:

The bonds shall have all the qualities of negotiable instruments under the laws of the State of Arkansas, subject to provisions as to registration or ownerships as set forth in subsection (a) of this section.

It shall be plainly stated on the face of each bond that it has been issued under the provisions of this subchapter and under the provisions of the resolution of the board authorizing the issuance thereof.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 918, §§ 10, 11; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-456, 46-457; Acts 2003, No. 1772, § 1.

12-41-709. Bonds — Sale — Disposition of proceeds.

The bonds may be sold in such manner and at such prices, including sale at discount, as the county jail board, municipal jail board, or public instrumentality jail board may accept.

The proceeds derived from the sale of revenue bonds by the board under the provisions of this subchapter shall be deposited into a board jail fund and shall be used for the purposes of constructing or expanding jails, and for all other expenses incidental to the issuance of the bonds, as authorized in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 918, §§ 10, 15; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-456, 46-461; Acts 2003, No. 1772, § 1.

12-41-710. Bonds — Coupons — Execution — Seal.

Bonds issued pursuant to this subchapter shall bear the manual or facsimile signature of the presiding officer of the county jail board, municipal jail board, or public instrumentality jail board and the manual authenticating signature of the trustee or paying agent of the bonds if the trustee or paying agent exists.

In case any of the officers whose signatures appear on the bonds shall cease to be officers before delivery of the bonds, their signature shall, nevertheless, be valid and sufficient for all purposes.

Each bond shall be sealed with the seal of the board.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 918, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-456; Acts 2003, No. 1772, § 1.

12-41-711. Bonds — Liability on.

(1)Bonds issued pursuant to this subchapter shall be obligations only of the issuing county jail board, municipal jail board, or public instrumentality jail board.

In no event shall they constitute any indebtedness for which the faith and credit of the county, municipality, or public instrumentality that created the board, any of their respective revenues, or of the State of Arkansas or any of its revenues, as used in Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 20, are pledged except that the fines and penalties described under this subchapter may be pledged.

The bonds shall not be secured by a mortgage or lien on any land, buildings, or property belonging to the county, municipality, or public instrumentality that created the board but may be secured by the real and personal property owned by the board and all other revenues of whatever nature that are received by the board or otherwise generated as a result of the board's activities.

No member of the board shall be personally liable on the bonds or for any damages sustained by anyone in connection with any contracts entered into or action taken in carrying out the powers, purposes, or authority of this subchapter or of the ordinance or resolution adopted by the quorum court or governing body of the municipality or public instrumentality unless he or she shall have acted with a corrupt intent.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 918, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-457; Acts 2003, No. 1772, § 1.

12-41-712. Bonds — Pledge of revenues — Funds.

(1)The principal, premiums, if any, interest on, and trustees' and paying agents' fees in connection with all bonds issued under this subchapter shall be secured by a lien on and pledge of:

History.

Acts 1983, No. 918, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-458; Acts 2003, No. 1772, § 1.

12-41-713. Bonds — Tax exemption.

Bonds and other evidences of indebtedness issued under the provisions of this subchapter and the interest thereon shall be exempt from all state, county, and municipal taxes, and this exemption shall include income, inheritance, and state taxes.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 918, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-459; Acts 2003, No. 1772, § 1.

12-41-714. Bonds — Investments by public entities.

Any municipality, board, commission, governing authority established by ordinance of any municipality, or governing authorities, respectively, of the local firefighter's pension and relief fund and police officer's pension and relief fund of any such municipality, the governing authority of any retirement system created by the General Assembly, or any agency may invest any of its funds not immediately needed for its purposes in bonds and other evidences of indebtedness issued under the provisions of this subchapter.

Any bonds issued under the provisions of this subchapter shall be eligible to secure the deposit of public funds.

All revenues derived from the fines collected under the provisions of this subchapter are determined to be fee revenues and are declared to be cash funds.

The revenues shall not be deposited into the county treasury, municipal treasury, or public instrumentality treasury but shall be deposited into the bank or banks selected by the county jail board, municipal jail board, or public instrumentality jail board.

The fee revenues as provided in this section shall be collected and applied as provided in this subchapter until the principal, premiums, if any, and interest on bonds issued under this subchapter, with trustees' and paying agents' fees shall be paid or adequate provision made for their payment.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 918, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-460; Acts 2003, No. 1772, § 1.

12-41-715. Fees, costs, etc. — Disposition.

Any county, municipality, or public instrumentality may, by ordinance or resolution, provide that all or any identified portion of the revenues derived by the county, municipality, or public instrumentality from all or any identified portion of the fines or penalties as defined in this subchapter shall be remitted to and deposited by the county treasurer, municipal treasurer, or public instrumentality treasurer into one (1) or more banks doing business in the county, municipality, or county or municipality in which the public instrumentality is primarily located, to the credit of a jail revenue bond fund that may be created in connection with the issuance of debt to be used solely for the purposes as provided in this subchapter.

If any person charged with a felony or misdemeanor for which a fine or penalty, as defined in this subchapter, is imposed shall post bond and forfeit it upon failure to appear on the date set for trial, the entire amount or any identified portion of the bond forfeiture may be deposited into the jail revenue bond fund as provided in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 918, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-455; Acts 2003, No. 1772, § 1.

12-41-716. Use of board jail fund for supervision and transportation of inmates.

In addition to any other purposes for which funds in a county jail board jail fund, municipal jail board jail fund, or public instrumentality jail board jail fund may be used, the funds may be used for the transportation and supervision of inmates assigned to outside work projects or for transporting inmates to a Division of Correction facility, as determined by the board.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 643, § 1; 2003, No. 1772, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 839.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction”.

12-41-717. Contract with governmental entities — Authority to create boards.

Each county, municipality, public instrumentality, and other governmental entity of this state is authorized and empowered, upon ordinance or resolution of the governing body, to enter into long-term or short-term contracts with a county jail board, municipal jail board, or public instrumentality jail board under which the board provides nightly or other periodic housing of the entity's misdemeanants or other incarcerants for fee compensation or other consideration.

Each county, municipality, and public instrumentality is authorized and empowered to adopt ordinances or resolutions that provide for the creation of boards under this subchapter.

The boards shall constitute and comprise political subdivisions of the county or municipality that creates the boards or, in the case of public instrumentality boards, political subdivisions of the county or municipality that created the public instrumentality that creates the boards.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1772, § 2.

12-41-718. Sole and exclusive law.

Except as provided under §12-41-702, the provisions of this subchapter are intended to solely and exclusively govern the manner in which a county jail board, municipal jail board, or public instrumentality jail board is organized, operated, managed, and administered.

No other laws of this state are applicable to the boards.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1772, § 2.

12-41-719. Repayment of debt.

Any municipality, county, public instrumentality, or other governmental entity may pledge all or any portion of its fines, penalties, bonds against fines, court costs, filing fees, other court fees, and other sums payable by judicial order, statute, ordinance, or otherwise imposed by law and collected by the entity towards the repayment of any debt issued by a jail board or any public facilities board operating, owning, or administering a jail facility.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1772, § 4.

Cross References. Public facilities boards — Powers — Bidding and appraisal requirements, §14-137-111.

Subchapter 8

— Juvenile Detention Facilities Cooperative Development and Operations Act

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 1995, No. 899, §§ 1-9, as amended by Acts 1997, No. 76, § 1, provided:

“SECTION 1.There is hereby created the Intergovernmental Juvenile Detention Council of the Tenth Judicial District, hereinafter referred to as the Council. The Council shall be composed of the county judge of each of the five counties comprising the district, the prosecuting attorney of the district, and one municipal mayor from each of the five counties. The mayor member from each county shall be selected by majority vote of all the mayors of incorporated cities and towns in the county. The members of the Council shall select from their number a chairperson, vice chairperson and such other officers of the Council as it deems appropriate. The Council shall meet at least semiannually and at such other times as it shall deem necessary to carry out its powers, functions and duties.”

“SECTION 2.A majority of the full membership of the Council shall constitute a quorum for doing business. An affirmative vote of a majority of the membership shall be necessary to take any action. Members of the Council shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for actual expenses incurred in carrying out their official duties.

“SECTION 3.The Council shall have the following powers and duties:

“(a)To receive funds from the State of Arkansas, the U. S. Government, and any other source whatsoever, to be used for the construction, maintenance and operation of a juvenile detention facility in the Tenth Judicial District, hereinafter referred to as the detention facility.

“(b)To take title to, serve as custodian of, and to manage and operate the detention facility or to contract for its operation.

“(c)To receive funds from the resident school districts of juveniles committed to the detention facility to be used for the education of juveniles in the facility.

“(d)To seek additional funds for the expansion, maintenance and operation of the detention facility and for programs and activities at the facility through gifts, grants, and donations from any and all public and private sources and to administer and disburse all funds received for the construction, expansion, maintenance and operation of the detention facility and for all programs and activities of the facility.

“(e)To cooperate and coordinate with the regional jail in the Tenth Judicial District with respect to feeding inmates, providing laundry services to inmates, maintenance of facilities at the regional jail and the juvenile detention facility, purchase of supplies, and such other services and purchases as the Council and the officials of the regional jail feel appropriate.

“(f)To cooperate and contract with any and all educational institutions in the area for providing education resources for inmates at the detention facility.

“(g)To contract with any and all health providers in the area including the Arkansas Department of Health for providing health services to inmates of the detention facility.

“(h)To establish a schedule of fees or charges to be billed to the various political subdivisions for the detention of juveniles in the facility.

“SECTION 4.(a)The Council is authorized to employ a director and such other personnel as it deems necessary and appropriate to assure the effective and efficient operation of the detention facility.

“(b)The Council, by a majority vote of its members, may elect to participate in the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System and to include its full-time employees within the membership of the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System. The Council may pay the contributions as the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System Board of Trustees shall prescribe.

“SECTION 5.The Council shall have the authority to adopt appropriate policies and practices regarding the operation of the detention facility as it deems necessary to assure the effective and efficient operation of the facility.

“SECTION 6.All provisions of this act of a general and permanent nature are amendatory to the Arkansas Code of 1987 Annotated and the Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall incorporate the same in the Code.

“SECTION 7.If any provision of this act or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are declared to be severable.

“SECTION 8.All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this act are hereby repealed.

“SECTION 9.EMERGENCY. It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that funds have been made available for the construction and operation of a juvenile detention facility in the Tenth Judicial District; that it is urgent that such facility be established as soon as practical; that before such facility can be established and operational, an appropriate body must be established to provide for the construction and to supervise the operation of the facility; and that this act is designed to accomplish this purpose and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Effective Dates. Acts 1989, No. 486, § 10: Mar. 10, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is necessary to prohibit the unnecessary incarceration of juveniles, to prohibit such juveniles from being treated as criminals, to place such juveniles under proper care, and to prohibit juveniles from associating with hardened adult criminals; and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary for the protection of juveniles. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation and protection of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2001, No. 1468, § 4: Apr. 10, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the continued operation of the juvenile detention centers located in Independence County, Yell County, Jefferson County, Washington and Miller Counties, is jeopardized by the obligation to repay existing revolving loans to the state. It is in the best interest of the public to abate these obligations to the state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

12-41-801. Title.

This subchapter shall be referred to and may be cited as the “Juvenile Detention Facilities Cooperative Development and Operations Act”.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 486, § 1.

12-41-802. Legislative findings and determinations.

The General Assembly finds that adequate juvenile detention facilities are essential to the safety and welfare of the people of this state.

It is legislatively determined that adequate juvenile detention facilities need to be made available and that a feasible and economic way of financing, constructing, acquiring, and operating the same is by authorizing cooperative endeavors for development and operation under the authority of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 486, § 2.

12-41-803. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Governing body” means the:

City council or board of directors or comparable body for a city;

Town council or board of directors or comparable body for a town; and

Quorum court for a county;

“Juvenile detention facility” means any facility for the temporary care of juveniles alleged to be delinquent, or adjudicated delinquent and awaiting disposition, who require secure custody in a physically restricting facility designed and operated with all entrances and exits under the exclusive control of the facility's staff, so that a juvenile may not leave the facility unsupervised or without permission;

“Local governmental units” means a city of any class, a town, or a county; and

“State” means the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 486, § 3.

12-41-804. Regional detention facilities.

Local governmental units are authorized to cooperate with other localities on a basis of mutual advantage and thereby to provide services and facilities in a manner and pursuant to forms of governmental organization that will accord best with geographic, economic, population, and other factors influencing the needs and development of local governmental units.

Local governmental units may contract with the state through the Division of Youth Services of the Department of Human Services for the financing, acquisition, construction, and operation of juvenile detention facilities, in particular, in accordance with the provisions and procedures as outlined in the Interlocal Cooperation Act, § 25-20-101 et seq.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning capital grant and revolving loan fund accounts, was repealed by Acts 2001, No. 1468, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1989, No. 486, § 5.

Any award of funds under this section shall be subject to review and approval by the Division of Youth Services, which shall promulgate rules to effectuate the provisions of this section.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (c).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (c).

History.

Acts 1989, No. 486, § 4.

12-41-805. [Repealed.]

(1)Grant and loan funds shall only be awarded under this subchapter upon submission of evidence of the ability to provide an amount of local public or private dollars, or both, equal to or greater than one-third (1/3) of the state's capital grant contribution to any project.

In no event shall the state capital grant contribution to any project authorized under this subchapter exceed the sum of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000).

Any revolving loan funds utilized in meeting the total cost of any project authorized under this subchapter shall be interest free and shall have terms not to exceed ten (10) years.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 486, § 6; 2019, No. 315, § 914.